Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska81-2210
Community aging services, defined.

Community aging services means those activities and services which fulfill the goals of the Nebraska Community Aging Services Act, which are necessary to promote, restore, or support self-sufficiency and independence for older persons, and which include: (1) Congregate activities, including, but not limited to, senior centers, group meals, volunteerism, adult day services, and recreation; and (2) individual services, including, but not limited to, specialized transportation, meals-on-wheels, home handyman services, home health care services, legal services, counseling related to problems of aging or encouraging access to aging services, and senior companion volunteer services.

Laws 1982, LB 404, § 10;

Laws 1991, LB 58, § 10;

Laws 2000, LB 819, § 156;

Laws 2000, LB 1101, § 1.